North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-33 Plant Pests [Repealed]

4-33-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 89, § 1; 1975, ch. 62, § 1; 1983, ch. 104, § 1; 1987, ch. 90, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2013, ch. 69, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-02.
Administration — Rulemaking authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 89, § 2; 1983, ch. 104, § 2; 1987, ch. 90, § 2; 2009, ch. 76, §
1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-03.
Authority for voluntary measures. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 89, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-04.
Authority for plant quarantine. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 89, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-05.
Authority for abatement and emergency measures. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 89, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-06.
Authority for inspections — Warrants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 89, § 6; 1991, ch. 326, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-07.
Cooperation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 89, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-08.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 89, § 8; 1975, ch. 106, § 27; 1983, ch. 104, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-09.
Authority for compensation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 62, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-10.
Authority for local pest control and regulations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 104, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-11.
Authority for financing local control programs — County pest coordinator. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 62, § 4; 1983, ch. 104, § 5; 1983, ch. 606, § 11; 1985, ch. 102, § 1; 1993, ch. 58, § 1; 2001, ch. 510, § 1; 2005, ch. 601, § 1; 2009, ch. 86, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 8, effective January 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-33-12.
Authority for domestic and export certification. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 104, § 6; 1987, ch. 90, § 3; 2007, ch. 65, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.